District of Columbia statutes.
21-907

Transfer of military personnel.

A person belonging to the armed forces arrested, apprehended, detained, or committed pursuant to this chapter shall, upon the request of the head of the department having jurisdiction over the service to which he belongs, be transferred forthwith to the custody of his service.

Sept. 14, 1965, 79 Stat. 765, Pub. L. 89-183, § 1
1973 Ed., § 21-907.
1981 Ed., § 21-907.
This section is referenced in § 21-902.